Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 4

Court of Appeals

16-4-101. Establishment.

There shall be an appellate court composed of twelve (12) judges, styled the court of appeals.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 6325a1; mod. Code 1932, § 10606; Acts 1978, ch. 836, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-401.

Cross-References. Power of general assembly to create courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Law Reviews.

A Simplified System of Appellate Procedure, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 651.

Appellate Court Voting Rights, 49 Vand. L. Rev. 997 (1996).

Justiciability in Tennessee, Part Three: Timing (Barbara Kritchevsky), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 177 (1986).

The Tennessee Court of Appeals: How Often It Corrects the Trial Courts — and Why, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Court of appeals precedent, OAG 07-098 (7/3/07).

Comparative Legislation. Appeals courts:

Ala. Code § 12-3-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 16-12-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 15-3-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 22A.010 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. §§ 477.040, 477.160 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-16 et seq.; § 7A-26 et seq.

Va. Code § 17-116.01 et seq.

Cited: In re Scalf's Adoption, 176 Tenn. 581, 144 S.W.2d 772, 1940 Tenn. LEXIS 104 (1940); In re T.B.H., — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 239 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 20, 2007).

16-4-102. Election and qualifications of judges — Oaths.

The court of appeals shall be composed of twelve (12) judges, of whom no more than four (4) shall be residents of the same grand division of the state. Immediately preceding appointment, each judge shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, shall have been a resident of the state for at least five (5) consecutive years, shall have been a resident of the grand division from which the judge is appointed for at least one (1) year, and shall be licensed to practice law in this state. For purposes of this subsection (a), “resident” has the same meaning as defined in § 2-1-104.

The oaths of office of the judges of the court of appeals shall be filed and entered on the minutes of the court in the particular grand division from which the judge has been appointed and confirmed or subsequently elected. The oath shall likewise be filed and entered on the records in the office of the secretary of state at Nashville.

The judges of the court of appeals shall be elected by the qualified voters of the state in a statewide retention election conducted in accordance with title 17, chapter 4, part 1. Vacancies on the court of appeals shall be filled by the governor in accordance with title 17, chapter 4, part 1.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 6325a3; mod. Code 1932, § 10607; Acts 1978, ch. 836, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-402; Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote the section which read: “At the regular judicial election held every eight (8) years, there shall be elected twelve (12) judges of the court of appeals, of whom not more than four (4) shall reside in one (1) grand division of the state, and each of whom shall be not less than thirty (30) years of age, and shall have been a resident of the state five (5) years before qualification; and be learned in the law.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Cross-References. Filling of vacancy in office, § 8-48-109.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Impeachment of judges or chancellors, title 8, ch. 46.

Vacancies in office, § 17-1-301.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Attorney General Opinions. Factors used to determine residency status, OAG 95-019 (3/27/95).

16-4-103. Tenure and compensation of judges.

The tenure of office is eight (8) years, and the judges shall receive compensation as fixed in § 8-23-103.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 6325a3; mod. Code 1932, § 10608; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-403.

16-4-104. Organizational meetings — Rules.

At the first meeting of the court after the regular judicial election, the members of the court shall choose the presiding judge of the court of appeals and adopt rules of practice; and the presiding judge shall, on the request of a majority of the members, call meetings thereafter for the purpose of reconsidering or revising the rules.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 7; Shan. Supp., § 6325a7; Code 1932, § 10615; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-404.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Internal Operating Procedures of the Tennessee Court of Appeals.

16-4-105. Presiding judges.

The entire court shall have one (1) presiding judge, chosen by the members of the court, and, when sitting in sections, each section shall at all times have a presiding judge to be chosen by its members.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 6325a6; Code 1932, § 10614; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-405.

16-4-106. Clerks and marshals.

The clerks and marshals of the supreme court shall also be the clerks and marshals of the court of appeals, and shall perform the same duties and be subject to the same liabilities and receive the same compensation as are prescribed by law.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 6325a15; Code 1932, § 10628; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-406.

Cross-References. Law clerks, § 8-23-109.

Supreme court clerks, title 18, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12.

16-4-107. Expenses.

The expenses of the court of appeals shall be paid out of the state treasury, upon the warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 6325a15; mod. Code 1932, §§ 153, 10628; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 153; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-407.

16-4-108. Jurisdiction — Venue.

The jurisdiction of the court of appeals is appellate only, and extends to all civil cases except workers' compensation cases and appeals pursuant to § 37-10-304(g).

All cases within the jurisdiction conferred on the court of appeals shall, for purposes of review, be taken directly to the court of appeals in the division within which the case arose, the eastern division to include Hamilton County and the western division to include Shelby County. As to all other cases, the exclusive right of removal and review is in the supreme court. Any case removed by mistake to the wrong court shall by that court be transferred to the court having jurisdiction of the case, direct.

The court of appeals also has appellate jurisdiction over civil or criminal contempt arising out of a civil matter.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 10; Shan. Supp., § 6325a10; Code 1932, § 10618; Acts 1951, ch. 9, § 1; 1951, ch. 66, § 1; 1977, ch. 390, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-408; Acts 1989, ch. 40, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 2; 1992, ch. 952, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 40, § 4 provided that any action pending on July 1, 1989, shall be maintained under law prior to the 1989 amendment by that act until its final disposition.

Acts 1989, ch. 147, § 12 provided that any and all matters filed or pending as of July 1, 1989, shall be disposed of under prior law.

Acts 1992, ch. 952, § 15 provided that the amendments by that act apply to all matters as to which a notice of appeal is filed from and after May 1, 1992.

Cross-References. Appeals from Marion County courts, § 16-2-101.

Attorney disciplinary proceedings, appeal from circuit or chancery court direct to Supreme Court, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 9, § 1.3.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 9, § 1.3.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 664, 699.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 778, 845.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 15-17, 28, 30, 82, 116; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, § 25; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 30; 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, §§ 19, 20; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 21.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee— 1977, VII. Appellate Review of the Disposition (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 366.

Attorney General Opinions. Appeals from grant or denial of order of protection, OAG 98-043 (2/17/98).

Cited: Ford Motor Co. v. Pace, 206 Tenn. 559, 335 S.W.2d 360, 1960 Tenn. LEXIS 394, 1960 Tenn. LEXIS 395 (1960); Paris v. Paris-Henry County Public Utility Dist., 207 Tenn. 388, 340 S.W.2d 885, 1960 Tenn. LEXIS 469 (1960); In re Estate of Deskins, 214 Tenn. 608, 381 S.W.2d 921, 1964 Tenn. LEXIS 512 (1964); Dickson v. Houston, 221 Tenn. 138, 425 S.W.2d 586, 1968 Tenn. LEXIS 453 (1968); Greer v. American Sec. Ins. Co., 223 Tenn. 390, 445 S.W.2d 904, 1969 Tenn. LEXIS 424 (1969); State ex rel. Pemberton v. Wilson, 481 S.W.2d 760, 1972 Tenn. LEXIS 348 (Tenn. 1972); Ohio Casualty Ins. Co. v. Travelers Indem. Co., 493 S.W.2d 465, 1973 Tenn. LEXIS 504 (Tenn. 1973); Pidgeon-Thomas Iron Co. v. Garner, 495 S.W.2d 826, 1973 Tenn. LEXIS 496 (Tenn. 1973); Rhodes v. Pioneer Parking Lot, Inc., 501 S.W.2d 569, 1973 Tenn. LEXIS 535 (Tenn. 1973); State v. Jackson, 503 S.W.2d 185, 1973 Tenn. LEXIS 440 (Tenn. 1973); Jackson v. Chambers, 510 S.W.2d 74, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 501 (Tenn. 1974); State ex rel. Wood v. Memphis, 510 S.W.2d 889, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 510 (Tenn. 1974); State Farm Mut. Ins. Co. v. Taylor, 511 S.W.2d 464, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 495 (Tenn. 1974); Gentry v. Davis, 512 S.W.2d 4, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 475 (Tenn. 1974); Metropolitan Government of Nashville & Davidson County v. Reynolds, 512 S.W.2d 6, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 476 (Tenn. 1974); Moore v. Old Republic Ins. Co., 512 S.W.2d 564, 1974 Tenn. LEXIS 489 (Tenn. 1974); Great American Ins. Co. v. Hartford Acci. & Indem. Co., 519 S.W.2d 579, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 706 (Tenn. 1975); Davis v. Hinton, 519 S.W.2d 776, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 711 (Tenn. 1975); Martin v. State, 519 S.W.2d 793, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 715 (Tenn. 1975); Norman v. Tennessee State Board of Claims, 533 S.W.2d 719, 1975 Tenn. LEXIS 547 (Tenn. 1975); White v. Roden Electrical Supply Co., 536 S.W.2d 346, 1976 Tenn. LEXIS 630 (Tenn. 1976); Ezell v. Buhler, 557 S.W.2d 62, 1977 Tenn. LEXIS 668 (Tenn. 1977); Frye v. Crowell, 563 S.W.2d 788, 1978 Tenn. LEXIS 534 (Tenn. 1978); Metropolitan Development & Housing Agency v. Leech, 591 S.W.2d 427, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 524 (Tenn. 1979); Union Planters Nat'l Bank v. Inman, 588 S.W.2d 757, 1979 Tenn. App. LEXIS 351 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1979); Mitchell v. Mitchell, 594 S.W.2d 699, 1980 Tenn. LEXIS 421 (Tenn. 1980); Doochin v. Rackley, 610 S.W.2d 715, 1981 Tenn. LEXIS 397 (Tenn. 1981); State v. Lawyer, 619 S.W.2d 153, 1981 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 357 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1981); State ex rel. Lockert v. Crowell, 631 S.W.2d 702, 1982 Tenn. LEXIS 398 (Tenn. 1982); Pickett v. Brown, 638 S.W.2d 369, 1982 Tenn. LEXIS 430 (Tenn. 1982); Ashe v. Leech, 653 S.W.2d 398, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 676 (Tenn. 1983); Carter v. Olsen, 660 S.W.2d 483, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 732 (Tenn. 1983); Farmer v. Board of Professional Responsibility of Supreme Court, 660 S.W.2d 490, 1983 Tenn. LEXIS 795 (Tenn. 1983); State ex rel. Shelby County Election Com. v. Shelby County Bd. of Comm'rs, 656 S.W.2d 9, 1983 Tenn. App. LEXIS 596 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1983); Super Flea Market, Inc. v. Olsen, 677 S.W.2d 449, 1984 Tenn. LEXIS 941 (Tenn. 1984); State ex rel. Baugh v. Williamson County Hospital Trustees, 679 S.W.2d 934, 1984 Tenn. LEXIS 875 (Tenn. 1984); Cleveland Bank & Trust Co. v. Olsen, 682 S.W.2d 200, 1984 Tenn. LEXIS 904 (Tenn. 1984); State ex rel. SCA Chemical Services, Inc. v. Sanidas, 681 S.W.2d 557, 1984 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3429 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1984); Gibson County Special School Dist. v. Palmer, 691 S.W.2d 544, 1985 Tenn. LEXIS 523 (Tenn. 1985); State v. Orr, 694 S.W.2d 297, 1985 Tenn. LEXIS 535 (Tenn. 1985); Foley v. Dayton Bank & Trust, 696 S.W.2d 356, 1985 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2778 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1985); State, Dep't of Revenue v. Moore, 722 S.W.2d 367, 1986 Tenn. LEXIS 846 (Tenn. 1986); Tennessee Farmers' Cooperative v. State, 736 S.W.2d 87, 1987 Tenn. LEXIS 960 (Tenn. 1987); Sweeney v. State Dep't of Transp., 744 S.W.2d 905, 1987 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2853 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1987); WRG Enterprises, Inc. v. Crowell, 758 S.W.2d 214, 1988 Tenn. LEXIS 176 (Tenn. 1988); Aluminum Co. of America v. Celauro, 762 S.W.2d 107, 1988 Tenn. LEXIS 198 (Tenn. 1988); Summers v. Thompson, 764 S.W.2d 182, 1988 Tenn. LEXIS 108 (Tenn. 1988); In re Estate of Powers, 767 S.W.2d 659, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 756 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988); Richards Mfg. Co. v. Great American Ins. Co., 773 S.W.2d 916, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3433 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986); Freeman v. Burson, 802 S.W.2d 210, 1990 Tenn. LEXIS 337 (Tenn. 1990); Metropolitan Government of Nashville & Davidson County v. Tennessee State Bd. of Equalization, 817 S.W.2d 953, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 342 (Tenn. 1991); Potts v. State, 833 S.W.2d 60, 1992 Tenn. LEXIS 424 (Tenn. 1992); Williams v. Williamson County Bd. of Educ., 890 S.W.2d 788, 1994 Tenn. App. LEXIS 461 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1994); Stewart Title Guar. Co. v. FDIC, 936 S.W.2d 266, 1996 Tenn. App. LEXIS 532 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1996); Williamson County Broad. Co. v. Intermedia Partners, 987 S.W.2d 550, 1998 Tenn. App. LEXIS 559 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1998); Storey v. Nichols, 27 S.W.3d 886, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 218 (Tenn. 2000); Smith v. Harriman Util. Bd., 26 S.W.3d 879, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 78 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); Green v. Innovative Recovery Servs., Inc., 42 S.W.3d 917, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 514 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); Hodges v. Tennessee AG, 43 S.W.3d 918, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 785 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); State v. Gray, 46 S.W.3d 749, 2000 Tenn. App. LEXIS 677 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2000); Tip's Package Store, Inc. v. Commercial Ins. Managers, Inc., 86 S.W.3d 543, 2001 Tenn. App. LEXIS 893 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2001); Freeman v. Freeman, 147 S.W.3d 234, 2003 Tenn. App. LEXIS 660 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2003); Moody v. Hutchison, 159 S.W.3d 15, 2004 Tenn. App. LEXIS 331 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2004); Bell v. Todd, 206 S.W.3d 86, 2005 Tenn. App. LEXIS 583 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2005); McCall v. Nat'l Health Corp., — S.W.3d —, 2006 Tenn. LEXIS 989 (Tenn. Nov. 3, 2006); Linn v. Howard, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 52 (Tenn. Ct. App. Jan. 26, 2007); In re T.B.H., — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 239 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 20, 2007); Konvalinka v. Chattanooga-Hamilton County Hosp. Auth., 249 S.W.3d 346, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 103 (Tenn. Feb. 13, 2008); Nix v. Cantrell (In re J.M.N.), — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 346 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 13, 2008); State v. Ream, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 539 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 18, 2008); Byars v. Young, 327 S.W.3d 42, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 344 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 20, 2010).

16-4-109. Number of judges necessary to decision.

When sitting in sections of three (3) judges each, the concurrence of two (2) of the judges shall be sufficient to determine all matters coming before the section; and such action, without more, shall have effect, in all respects, as if the entire court of appeals had participated in the action.

When the court sits en banc, the concurrence of seven (7) of the judges, and, when two (2) sections sit together, the concurrence of five (5) of the judges, shall so suffice and be effective.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 6325a5; mod. Code 1932, §§ 10612, 10613; Acts 1978, ch. 836, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-409.

Law Reviews.

A Survey of Civil Procedure in Tennessee — 1977, IV. Pretrial Procedure (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 308.

Collateral References. 21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 183, 217, 458.

16-4-110. Process.

The court of appeals, and the individual members of the court, are given power to grant writs of error, certiorari and supersedeas in cases within the jurisdiction of the court, such writs to be returnable to the court of appeals in the division in which they arose, and the practice in those cases in the court of appeals shall be the same as is prescribed for the supreme court.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 11; Shan. Supp., § 6325a11; Code 1932, § 10619; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-410.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

16-4-111. Effect of judgments.

The court of appeals is a court of record, and its judgment shall be executed as provided in the Tennessee rules of appellate procedure.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 13; Shan. Supp., § 6325a13; mod. Code 1932, § 10627; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 10627; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-411; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 42(a), (b) .

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Cited: Pairamore v. Pairamore, 547 S.W.2d 545, 1977 Tenn. LEXIS 559 (Tenn. 1977).

16-4-112. Concurrent sessions.

The court shall sit in sections concurrently as ordered by the presiding judge in Knoxville, Nashville and Jackson, for the purpose of hearing and determining cases before it and for such length of time as may, in the judgment of the court, be required for the dispatch of the business before the court at such places.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 8; Shan. Supp., § 6325a8; mod. Code 1932, § 10616; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-412; Acts 1987, ch. 256, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 218.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

16-4-113. Sitting in sections — Assignment of judges.

In order to expedite the trial and decision of cases, the court of appeals, when the court deems it advisable so to do, is authorized and empowered to sit in sections of three (3) judges each, at Knoxville, Nashville and Jackson, to hear and determine cases just as though all twelve (12) members were present and participating; and the presiding judge of the court of appeals shall in such event have the right, from time to time, to assign and reassign the judges and sections.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 6325a4; mod. Code 1932, § 10611; Acts 1978, ch. 836, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-413.

Law Reviews.

A Simplified System of Appellate Procedure, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 651. The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

16-4-114. Transfers between grand divisions.

Any case on the docket of the court of appeals, in any grand division, in which any member of the court residing in that grand division is disqualified to participate, upon order of two (2) of the judges residing in the grand division where the case is pending, may be transferred to, tried and determined in the court of appeals sitting in another grand division where no disqualification of judges exists; and a true copy of the order, duly certified by the clerk, together with a certified bill of the costs accrued on the appeal, shall be transmitted with the transcript of the record to the court of appeals in the grand division to which the case is transferred.

The court of appeals is empowered to make all necessary rules to carry out the purpose of this section and to expedite the hearing of such cases.

Acts 1929, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; Code 1932, §§ 10625, 10626; Acts 1961, ch. 281, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-414.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Collateral References. 21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 456, 458.

16-4-115. Rules of appellate procedure govern.

The procedure on appeal in the court of appeals shall be governed by the Tennessee rules of appellate procedure.

Acts 1925, ch. 100, § 9; Shan. Supp., § 6325a9; mod. Code 1932, § 10617; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-415; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 24-26.